Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-1609
Independent actuary, defined.

Independent actuary shall mean a member in good standing of the Society of Actuaries or the American Academy of Actuaries who is not an employee of the plan sponsor. Selection of an independent actuary by a plan sponsor shall comply with the conflict of interest provisions of the Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act.

Laws 1991, LB 167, § 9.

Nebraska Political Accountability and Disclosure Act, see section 49-1401.